ani_morph_verbs.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERBS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS
# (Verbs[-initial_aggr] (ToAorStem | Aorist | Perfect))[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]]
# (Verbs[-initial_aggr] Aorist)[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]] Conditional
# (Verbs[-initial_aggr] (Aorist | Perfect))[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]] Counterfactual
Verbs[-initial_aggr] PrsEndings

# ((agrCL Verbs[initial_aggr]) (ToAorStem | Aorist | Perfect))[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]]
# ((agrCL Verbs[initial_aggr]) Aorist)[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]] Conditional
# ((agrCL Verbs[initial_aggr]) (Aorist | Perfect))[^[pst_i,pst_o,pst_a,pst_u]] Counterfactual
agrCL Verbs[initial_aggr] PrsEndings

PATTERN PrsEndings
ToPrsStem
(ToPrsStem[q] | [<fut><neg>:>ийа>ccу]) InterrogativeLE (Medit)?
ToPrsStem[q,-neg] InterrogativeKOLE (Medit)?

LEXICON ToPrsStem
<inf>:>ери
<inf.neg>:>ессури
<hab>:>е[q]
<hab><neg>:>е>ссу[q,neg]
<fut>:>ийа[q]
<fut><pl>:>ийа>л
<fut><neg>:>есса[q,neg]
<fut><neg><pl>:>ессал
<fut.imp>:>ехъо
<fut.ptcp>:>ийа
<fut.ptcp><pl>:>ийа>л
<fut.ptcp><neg>:>есса
<fut.ptcp><neg><pl>:>ессал
<pref.cvb>:>ебди
<pref.cvb.neg>:>ессубди
<ant.cvb>:>еблълъирий
<snp>:>ебагъий
<proh>:>есхъо

LEXICON InterrogativeLE
<interr>:>ле

LEXICON InterrogativeKOLE
<interr>:>кIоле
<neg><interr>:>c>кIоле

LEXICON Medit
<medit>:>хъен

# 
# LEXICON Aorist
# <aor>:>и[pst_i]
# <aor>:>о[pst_o]
# <aor>:>а[pst_a]
# <aor>:>у[pst_u]
# 
# LEXICON Perfect
# <pf>:>ий[pst_i]
# <pf>:>ой[pst_o]
# <pf>:>ай[pst_a]
# <pf>:>уй[pst_u]
# 
# LEXICON ToAorStem
# <cvb>:>ий[pst_i]
# <cvb>:>ой[pst_o]
# <cvb>:>ай[pst_a]
# <cvb>:>уй[pst_u]
# 
# <pf.ptcp>:>иб[pst_i]
# <pf.ptcp>:>об[pst_o]
# <pf.ptcp>:>аб[pst_a]
# <pf.ptcp>:>уб[pst_u]
# 
# <pf.ptcp><pl>:>иб>ул[pst_i]
# <pf.ptcp><pl>:>об>ул[pst_o]
# <pf.ptcp><pl>:>аб>ул[pst_a]
# <pf.ptcp><pl>:>уб>ул[pst_u]
# 
# <prog>:>ир[pst_i]
# <prog>:>ор[pst_o]
# <prog>:>ар[pst_a]
# <prog>:>ур[pst_u]
# 
# <prog>:>ирадо[pst_i]
# <prog>:>орадо[pst_o]
# <prog>:>арадо[pst_a]
# <prog>:>урадо[pst_u]
# 
# <prog>:>иралло[pst_i]
# <prog>:>оралло[pst_o]
# <prog>:>аралло[pst_a]
# <prog>:>уралло[pst_u]
# 
# <prog><pl>:>ир>ил[pst_i]
# <prog><pl>:>ор>ил[pst_o]
# <prog><pl>:>ар>ил[pst_a]
# <prog><pl>:>ур>ил[pst_u]
# 
# <prog><pl>:>ирадо>л[pst_i]
# <prog><pl>:>орадо>л[pst_o]
# <prog><pl>:>арадо>л[pst_a]
# <prog><pl>:>урадо>л[pst_u]
# 
# <prog><pl>:>иралло>л[pst_i]
# <prog><pl>:>оралло>л[pst_o]
# <prog><pl>:>аралло>л[pst_a]
# <prog><pl>:>уралло>л[pst_u]
# 
# LEXICON Conditional
# <cond>:>бор
# <conc>:>боло
# 
# LEXICON Counterfactual
# <ctrf>:>ламдур
# <ctrf>:>ламдури
